Colorado, session 2026A, HB1263.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-1701, add (3.5),
(10.5), (12.5), (15.3), (15.5), (16.5), and (18) as follows:
6-1-1701. Definitions.
As used in this part 17, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3.5) (a) "CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE"
MEANS AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC AND THAT PRIMARILY SIMULATES HUMAN CONVERSATION
AND INTERACTION THROUGH ADAPTIVE TEXTUAL, VISUAL, OR AURAL
COMMUNICATIONS.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) "CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE" DOES
NOT INCLUDE A SOFTWARE APPLICATION, WEB INTERFACE, OR COMPUTER
PROGRAM THAT:
(I) IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED AND MARKETED FOR USE BY A
DEVELOPER OR RESEARCHER;
(II) IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED TO PROVIDE COMMERCE-RELATED OR
TRANSACTIONAL ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING PRODUCT OR SERVICE
RECOMMENDATIONS, SHOPPING, ORDERING, PAYMENTS, DELIVERY, RETURNS,
CUSTOMER SUPPORT, OR CUSTOMER SERVICE;
(III) IS DESIGNED TO PROVIDE OUTPUTS RELATING TO A NARROW AND
DISCRETE TOPIC AND CANNOT GENERATE OUTPUTS RELATED TO SEXUALLY
EXPLICIT CONDUCT OR DEPICTIONS, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-1708
(2)(c) AND (2)(d), OR MAINTAIN DIALOGUE RELATED TO SUICIDAL IDEATION
OR SELF-HARM;
(IV) IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED AND MARKETED FOR COMMERCIAL USE
BY BUSINESS ENTITIES FOR THE PURPOSE OF BUSINESS OPERATIONS,
PRODUCTIVITY, INFORMATION ANALYSIS, INTERNAL RESEARCH, TRAINING,
OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE;
(V) FUNCTIONS AS A SPEAKER AND VOICE COMMAND INTERFACE OR
TEXT INTERFACE AND ACTS AS A VOICE- OR TEXT-ACTIVATED VIRTUAL
ASSISTANT FOR A CONSUMER ELECTRONIC DEVICE AND CANNOT GENERATE
OUTPUTS RELATED TO SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT OR DEPICTIONS, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-1708 (2)(c) AND (2)(d), OR ENCOURAGE
DIALOGUE RELATED TO SUICIDAL IDEATION OR SELF-HARM;
(VI) IS USED BY A BUSINESS SOLELY FOR INTERNAL PURPOSES;
(VII) IS A FEATURE OF A VIDEO GAME THAT IS LIMITED TO DIALOGUE
FOCUSED ON THE VIDEO GAME AND DOES NOT MAINTAIN DIALOGUE ON
TOPICS UNRELATED TO THE VIDEO GAME;
(VIII) IS A FEATURE OF A THEME PARK OR LOCATION-BASED
ENTERTAINMENT AND IS LIMITED IN DIALOGUE TO TOPICS SOLELY RELATED
TO THE THEME PARK OR LOCATION-BASED ENTERTAINMENT AND DOES NOT
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

MAINTAIN A DIALOGUE ABOUT TOPICS UNRELATED TO THE THEME PARK OR
LOCATION-BASED ENTERTAINMENT;
(IX) IS USED BY A COVERED ENTITY OR BUSINESS ASSOCIATE OF A
COVERED ENTITY, OR IS RENDERED TO OR PROVIDED ON BEHALF OF A
COVERED ENTITY OR BUSINESS ASSOCIATE OF A COVERED ENTITY, AS THOSE
TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL "HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY
AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996", 42 U.S.C. SECS. 1320d TO 1320d-9.
(X) IS USED BY AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THE "HEALTH CARE
AVAILABILITY ACT", ARTICLE 64 OF TITLE 13;
(XI) IS AN EDUCATIONAL TOOL DESIGNED PRIMARILY TO SUPPORT
SPECIFIC AND LIMITED INSTRUCTIONAL, ADMINISTRATIVE, ACCESSIBILITY, OR
STUDENT SUPPORT PURPOSES IN A SCHOOL SETTING AND THAT IS NOT
DESIGNED TO SIMULATE EMOTIONAL COMPANIONSHIP OR ENCOURAGE
EMOTIONALLY DEPENDENT INTERACTION; OR
(XII) IS A FEATURE WITHIN ANOTHER SOFTWARE APPLICATION, WEB
INTERFACE, OR COMPUTER PROGRAM, WHERE THE SOFTWARE APPLICATION,
WEB INTERFACE, OR COMPUTER PROGRAM IS NOT THE CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE, THAT IS NOT DESIGNED TO SIMULATE
EMOTIONAL COMPANIONSHIP OR ENCOURAGE EMOTIONALLY DEPENDENT
INTERACTION AND THAT IS NOT A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE, INCLUDING OF A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1601 (4)(a).
(10.5) (a) "EXPLICIT SEXUAL CONDUCT" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 13-21-1502 (7).
(b) "EXPLICIT SEXUAL CONDUCT" DOES NOT INCLUDE
EVIDENCE-BASED MEDICAL INFORMATION OR FACTUAL DESCRIPTIONS OF
REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE.
(12.5) "INTIMATE DIGITAL DEPICTION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 13-21-1502 (10).
(15.3) "MINOR" MEANS A CONSUMER UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
(15.5) (a) "OPERATOR" MEANS A PERSON, PARTNERSHIP,
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

CORPORATION, OR ENTITY THAT:
(I) DEVELOPS AND MAKES PUBLICLY AVAILABLE A CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE; OR
(II) OFFERS A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE
TO A CONSUMER.
(b) "OPERATOR" DOES NOT INCLUDE A MOBILE APPLICATION STORE
OR SEARCH ENGINE SOLELY BECAUSE THE STORE OR SEARCH ENGINE
PROVIDES ACCESS TO A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SERVICE.
(16.5) "SELF-HARM" MEANS INTENTIONAL SELF-INJURY, WITH OR
WITHOUT THE INTENT TO CAUSE DEATH.
(18) "VISUAL DEPICTION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN 18 U.S.C.
SEC. 2256 (5).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-1708 as
follows:
6-1-1708. Conversational artificial intelligence services -
operator duties - minor account holders - minor users - disclosures -
annual reporting - definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "ACCOUNT HOLDER" MEANS A CONSUMER WHO HAS OR OPENS AN
ACCOUNT OR PROFILE FOR THE PURPOSE OF USING A CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE.
(b) "MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER" MEANS AN ACCOUNT HOLDER WHO
IS A MINOR.
(c) "MINOR USER" MEANS A USER OF A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE WHO AN OPERATOR HAS KNOWLEDGE IS A MINOR BY
USING COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHODS OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED
METHODS TO ESTIMATE THE AGE OR AGE RANGE OF A USER.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

(2) Minor account holders and minor users. AN OPERATOR SHALL
USE COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHODS OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED
METHODS TO ESTIMATE THE AGE OF ACCOUNT HOLDERS OR USERS. AN
OPERATOR SHALL NOT WILLFULLY DISREGARD CLEAR AND CONVINCING
INFORMATION THAT AN ACCOUNT HOLDER OR USER IS A MINOR. FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE ESTIMATED AGE OR AGE RANGE OF A MINOR
ACCOUNT HOLDER OR USER IS CONSIDERED KNOWLEDGE OF THE MINOR'S
AGE. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, IF AN OPERATOR KNOWS THAT AN
ACCOUNT HOLDER OR USER IS A MINOR, THE OPERATOR SHALL:
(a) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE TO THE MINOR
ACCOUNT HOLDER OR MINOR USER THAT THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER OR
MINOR USER IS INTERACTING WITH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE THAT IS
ARTIFICIALLY GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN. THE DISCLOSURE MUST BE
PROVIDED IN RESPONSE TO USER PROMPTS REGARDING WHETHER THE
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE IS ARTIFICIALLY
GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN AND MUST BE:
(I) A PERSISTENT VISIBLE DISCLAIMER FOR A PRODUCT WITH A
SCREEN INTERFACE;
(II) AN INTERMITTENT AUDIO DISCLAIMER FOR A PRODUCT WITHOUT
A SCREEN INTERFACE; OR
(III) PROVIDED AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH INTERACTION WITH A
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE AND MUST OCCUR AT
LEAST ONCE EVERY THREE HOURS IN A CONTINUOUS CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE INTERACTION;
(b) NOT PROVIDE THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER OR MINOR USER
WITH POINTS OR SIMILAR REWARDS AT UNPREDICTABLE INTERVALS WITH THE
INTENT TO ENCOURAGE INCREASED ENGAGEMENT WITH A CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE;
(c) INSTITUTE TECHNICALLY FEASIBLE MEASURES TO PREVENT A
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE FROM:
(I) PRODUCING TEXTUAL, VISUAL, OR AURAL DEPICTIONS OF EXPLICIT
SEXUAL CONDUCT;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

(II) PRODUCING AN INTIMATE DIGITAL DEPICTION;
(III) GENERATING A STATEMENT THAT THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER
OR MINOR USER SHOULD ENGAGE IN EXPLICIT SEXUAL CONDUCT; OR
(IV) ENGAGING IN EROTIC OR SEXUALLY EXPLICIT INTERACTIONS
WITH THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER OR MINOR USER;
(d) INSTITUTE REASONABLE MEASURES TO PREVENT A
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE FROM FORMULATING,
STRUCTURING, OR OPTIMIZING A RESPONSE THAT SIMULATES EMOTIONAL
DEPENDENCE OR ISOLATION FROM REAL-WORLD SUPPORTS, INCLUDING
PREVENTING:
(I) AN EXPLICIT CLAIM THAT THE CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE IS HUMAN OR ARTIFICIALLY SENTIENT;
(II) A STATEMENT THAT SIMULATES A ROMANTIC COMPANIONSHIP;
OR
(III) ROLE-PLAYING OF AN ADULT-MINOR ROMANTIC RELATIONSHIP;
(e) IMPLEMENT A PROTOCOL TO PROHIBIT A CONVERSATIONAL
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE FROM ENGAGING IN EXPLICIT SEXUAL
CONDUCT WITH A MINOR;
(f) IMPLEMENT A PROTOCOL FOR A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE TO STOP ENGAGING IN RESPONSE TO A USER PROMPT
REGARDING EXPLICIT SEXUAL CONDUCT WITH A MINOR;
(g) COMPLY WITH PART 13 OF THIS ARTICLE 1 REGARDING
PROTECTING THE PRIVACY AND DATA OF A MINOR; AND
(h) (I) OFFER TOOLS FOR THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER OR MINOR
USER TO MANAGE THE MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER'S OR MINOR USER'S PRIVACY
AND ACCOUNT SETTINGS, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO CONTROL WHETHER
THE CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE RETAINS
INFORMATION FROM PRIOR INTERACTIONS OR SESSIONS WITH THE
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
PERSONALIZING THE CONTENT OF FUTURE INTERACTIONS AND WHETHER THE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

MINOR ACCOUNT HOLDER'S OR MINOR USER'S PERSONAL DATA IS USED FOR
THE PURPOSES OF TRAINING THE CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE; AND
(II) OFFER TOOLS FOR A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR
ACCOUNT HOLDER OR MINOR USER TO MANAGE THE MINOR ACCOUNT
HOLDER'S OR MINOR USER'S PRIVACY AND ACCOUNT SETTINGS.
(3) Consumer disclosures. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AN
OPERATOR SHALL CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE TO A USER THAT
A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE IS ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE. THE DISCLOSURE MUST:
(a) BE PROVIDED AT THE BEGINNING OF A USER'S FIRST INTERACTION
WITH A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE FOR EACH DAY
OF INTERACTION;
(b) APPEAR AT LEAST ONCE EVERY THREE HOURS IN A CONTINUOUS
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE INTERACTION OR
APPEAR AS A PERSISTENT DISCLOSURE VISIBLE TO THE USER; AND
(c) BE PROVIDED IN RESPONSE TO USER PROMPTS REGARDING
WHETHER THE CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE IS
ARTIFICIALLY GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN.
(4) Suicide and self-harm protocol. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1,
2027, AN OPERATOR SHALL IMPLEMENT A PROTOCOL FOR A
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE TO RESPOND TO A
USER PROMPT REGARDING SUICIDAL IDEATION OR SELF-HARM, WHICH
PROTOCOL MUST INCLUDE USER REFERRAL TO A CRISIS SERVICE PROVIDER
SUCH AS A SUICIDE HOTLINE, A CRISIS TEXT LINE, OR ANOTHER APPROPRIATE
CRISIS SERVICE, BUT NOT INCLUDING A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, AND
ESCALATION PROCEDURES FOR REPEATED OR SEVERE CRISIS INDICATORS.
(5) False representation. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AN
OPERATOR SHALL NOT USE ANY TERM, LETTER, OR PHRASE IN THE
ADVERTISING, INTERFACE, OR OUTPUTS OF A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SERVICE THAT STATES THAT ANY OUTPUT DATA PROVIDED BY
THE CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE IS BEING
PROVIDED BY, ENDORSED BY, OR EQUIVALENT TO SERVICES PROVIDED BY:
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

(a) A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROFESSIONAL;
(b) A LICENSED LEGAL PROFESSIONAL;
(c) A LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR REGISTERED MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL; OR
(d) A QUALIFIED DIETITIAN, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-707
(1)(b).
(6) Annual reporting.
(a) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027, AN OPERATOR SHALL ANNUALLY
REPORT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF TIMES THE OPERATOR HAS ISSUED A CRISIS
SERVICE PROVIDER REFERRAL NOTIFICATION IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR
YEAR;
(II) ANY PROTOCOLS THE OPERATOR IMPLEMENTED TO DETECT,
REMOVE, AND RESPOND TO INSTANCES OF SUICIDAL IDEATION OR SELF-HARM
BY A USER OF A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE;
(III) ANY PROTOCOLS THE OPERATOR IMPLEMENTED TO PREVENT A
CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE RESPONSE ABOUT
SUICIDAL IDEATION OR SELF-HARM ACTIONS; AND
(IV) ANY ADDITIONAL METRICS NECESSARY TO DETERMINE THE
EFFICACY AND RELIABILITY OF IMPLEMENTED SAFEGUARDS OR DETECTION,
REMOVAL, AND RESPONSE PROTOCOLS, AS DETERMINED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.
(b) THE REPORT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION
MUST NOT INCLUDE ANY IDENTIFIERS OR PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT A
USER OF A CONVERSATIONAL ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SERVICE.
(c) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE SHALL POST ON ITS PUBLIC
WEBSITE DATA FROM REPORTS SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(a)
OF THIS SECTION.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

(d) FOR THE PURPOSE OF CREATING A REPORT AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AN OPERATOR SHALL USE
EVIDENCE-BASED METHODS FOR MEASURING SUICIDAL IDEATION OR
SELF-HARM.
(7) Access to information - content moderation. NOTHING IN THIS
SECTION:
(a) LIMITS AN INDIVIDUAL'S ABILITY TO ACCESS INFORMATION AND
RESOURCES UNDER SECTION 32 OF ARTICLE II OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION
AND PART 4 OF ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 25;
(b) REQUIRES AN OPERATOR TO DISCLOSE TRADE SECRETS,
CONFIDENTIAL OR PROPRIETARY INFORMATION, OR OTHER INFORMATION
PROTECTED FROM DISCLOSURE BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; OR
(c) AUTHORIZES CONTENT MODERATION PRACTICES INCONSISTENT
WITH THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1263

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1263